Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIX Public Safety and Morals
General Provisions
230.260.
Authority of Kentucky Horse Racing Commission — Administrative regulations — Problem or compulsive gamblers.

The racing commission, in the interest of breeding or the improvement of breeds of horses, shall have all powers necessary and proper to carry out fully and effectually the provisions of this chapter including but without limitation the following:

The racing commission is vested with jurisdiction and supervision over all horse race meetings in this Commonwealth and over all associations and all persons on association grounds and may eject or exclude therefrom or any part thereof, any person, licensed or unlicensed, whose conduct or reputation is such that his presence on association grounds may, in the opinion of the racing commission, reflect on the honesty and integrity of horse racing or interfere with the orderly conduct of horse racing or racing at horse race meetings; provided, however, no persons shall be excluded or ejected from association grounds solely on the ground of race, color, creed, national origin, ancestry, or sex;

The racing commission is vested with jurisdiction over any person or entity that offers advance deposit account wagering to Kentucky residents. Any such person or entity under the jurisdiction of the racing commission shall be licensed by the racing commission, and the racing commission may impose a license fee not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) annually. The racing commission shall, by administrative regulation promulgated in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, establish conditions and procedures for the licensing of advance deposit account wagering providers to include but not be limited to:

A fee schedule for applications for licensure; and

Reporting requirements to include quarterly reporting on:

The amount wagered on Kentucky races; and

The total amount wagered by Kentuckians;

The racing commission is vested with jurisdiction over any totalisator company that provides totalisator services to a racing association located in the Commonwealth. A totalisator company under the jurisdiction of the racing commission shall be licensed by the racing commission, regardless of whether a totalisator company is located in the Commonwealth or operates from a location or locations outside of the Commonwealth, and the racing commission may impose a license fee on a totalisator company. The racing commission shall, by administrative regulation promulgated in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, establish conditions and procedures for the licensing of totalisator companies, and a fee schedule for applications for licensure;

The racing commission is vested with jurisdiction over any manufacturer, wholesaler, distributor, or vendor of any equine drug, medication, therapeutic substance, or metabolic derivative which is purchased by or delivered to a licensee or other person participating in Kentucky horse racing by means of the Internet, mail delivery, in-person delivery, or other means;

The racing commission is vested with jurisdiction over any horse training center or facility in the Commonwealth that records official timed workouts for publication;

The racing commission may require an applicant for a license under subsections (2) and (3) of this section to submit to a background check of the applicant, or of any individual or organization associated with the applicant. An applicant shall be required to reimburse the racing commission for the cost of any background check conducted;

The racing commission, its representatives and employees, may visit, investigate and have free access to the office, track, facilities, or other places of business of any licensee, or any person owning a horse or performing services regulated by this chapter on a horse registered to participate in a breeders incentive fund under the jurisdiction of the racing commission;

The racing commission shall have full authority to prescribe necessary and reasonable administrative regulations and conditions under which horse racing at a horse race meeting shall be conducted in this state and to fix and regulate the minimum amount of purses, stakes, or awards to be offered for the conduct of any horse race meeting;

Applications for licenses shall be made in the form, in the manner, and contain information as the racing commission may, by administrative regulation, require. Fees for all licenses issued under KRS

230.310

shall be prescribed by and paid to the racing commission;

The racing commission shall establish by administrative regulation minimum fees for jockeys to be effective in the absence of a contract between an employing owner or trainer and a jockey. The minimum fees shall be no less than those of July 1, 1985;

The racing commission may refuse to issue or renew a license, revoke or suspend a license, impose probationary conditions on a license, issue a written reprimand or admonishment, impose fines or penalties, deny purse money, require the forfeiture of purse money, or any combination thereof with regard to a licensee or other person participating in Kentucky horse racing for violation of any federal or state statute, regulation, or steward’s or racing commission’s directive, ruling, or order to preserve the integrity of Kentucky horse racing or to protect the racing public. The racing commission shall, by administrative regulation, establish the criteria for taking the actions described in this subsection;

The racing commission may issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses before it and for the production of documents, records, papers, books, supplies, devices, equipment, and all other instrumentalities related to pari-mutuel horse racing within the Commonwealth. The racing commission may administer oaths to witnesses and require witnesses to testify under oath whenever, in the judgment of the racing commission, it is necessary to do so for the effectual discharge of its duties;

The racing commission shall have authority to compel any racing association licensed under this chapter to file with the racing commission at the end of its fiscal year, a balance sheet, showing assets and liabilities, and an earnings statement, together with a list of its stockholders or other persons holding a beneficial interest in the association; and

The racing commission shall promulgate administrative regulations establishing safety standards for jockeys, which shall include the use of rib protection equipment. Rib protection equipment shall not be included in a jockey’s weight.

The racing commission shall promulgate administrative regulations establishing a self-exclusion list for individuals who self-identify as being problem or compulsive gamblers.

Each racing association shall display a notice to the public of the self-exclusion list and the method or methods individuals may use to self-identify at the track, online, or by phone.

Self-exclusion information collected by each racing association shall be forwarded to the racing commission, and the information from the racing associations shall be compiled into a comprehensive list that shall be provided to all racing associations.

Pursuant to KRS 61.878(1)(a), information collected under this subsection shall be excluded from the application of KRS

61.870

to

61.884

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 184, § 6; 1970, ch. 156, § 3; 1974, ch. 403, § 3; 1982, ch. 100, § 3, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 214, § 4, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 376, § 6, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 109, § 16, effective March 30, 1992; 2004, ch. 191, § 7, effective July 13, 2004; 2009, ch. 80, § 3, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 24, § 450, effective July 15, 2010; 2011, ch. 70, § 2, effective June 8, 2011; 2022 ch. 124, § 16, effective July 14, 2022.

230.265.
Kentucky Equine Drug Research Council.

There is hereby created a panel, to be known as the Kentucky Equine Drug Research Council, to advise the racing commission on the conduct of equine drug research and testing commissioned by the Kentucky Horse Racing Commission.

The council shall consist of nine (9) members appointed by the Governor. It is recommended that the Governor appoint one (1) person from each of the following groups, organizations, or professions:

A veterinarian, selected from a list of three (3) submitted by the Kentucky Association of Equine Veterinarians;

A horseman, selected from a list of three (3) submitted by the Kentucky division of the Horsemen’s Benevolent and Protective Association;

A pharmacologist, selected from a list of three (3) submitted by the University of Kentucky;

A Thoroughbred breeder, selected from a list of three (3) submitted by the Kentucky Thoroughbred Owners and Breeders, Inc.;

A legislator, selected from a list of three (3) submitted by the Legislative Research Commission;

A representative of a licensed racing association, chosen by the Governor;

A member of the harness racing industry, selected from a list of three (3) submitted by the chairman of the Kentucky Horse Racing Commission;

A member selected from a list of three (3) submitted by the Kentucky Harness Horsemen’s Association; and

A member of the Kentucky Horse Racing Commission, selected from a list of three (3) submitted by the chairman of the Kentucky Horse Racing Commission, to serve as chairman.

The council shall meet at the call of the chairman, a majority of the council, or at the request of the racing commission. Members shall serve at the pleasure of their respective sponsoring organizations and shall receive no compensation for serving.

The Kentucky Equine Drug Research Council shall:

Review equine drug research and testing research being conducted at the University of Kentucky, or with state funds;

Review and report to the racing commission on drug research and testing research being conducted elsewhere;

Advise the racing commission and make recommendations for establishing an effective drug regulatory policy for Kentucky racing; and

Report to the General Assembly any needed changes regarding the regulation of drugs in horse racing in the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

The funds received by the racing commission pursuant to KRS

138.510

shall be used for financing:

Drug research;

Testing research;

Equine medical research;

Equine health research issues; and

Any regulatory or administrative activity of the racing commission that is related to the research and issues described in subparagraphs 1. to 4. of this paragraph. Any expenditure under this subsection shall relate to the racing industry in Kentucky.

In authorizing expenditures, the council and the racing commission shall give funding priority to the activities described in this subsection which will take place, or are proposed to take place, in Kentucky over similar activities taking place outside Kentucky. However, expenditures under this subsection in furtherance of activities taking place outside Kentucky may be approved if the council and the racing commission determine that those expenditures will contribute to improvement in Kentucky’s racing industry and to the development of a useful knowledge base relating to the subjects expressed in paragraph (a)1. to 5. of this subsection.

The money received under this subsection shall be in addition to any funds appropriated to the racing commission for these purposes in the executive budget.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 100, § 5, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 240, § 4, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 109, § 17, effective March 30, 1992; 1998, ch. 216, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2004, ch. 191, § 42, effective July 13, 2004; 2009, ch. 80, § 4, effective June 25, 2009; 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 110, effective June 26, 2009; 2010, ch. 24, § 451, effective July 15, 2010; 2014, ch. 106, § 1, effective July 15, 2014.

230.270.
Biennial report to General Assembly required.

The racing commission shall biennially make a full report to the General Assembly of its proceedings for the two-year period ending December 31 preceding the meeting of the General Assembly and may embody in the report such suggestions and recommendations as it deems desirable.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 184, § 7, effective June 16, 1960; 2004, ch. 191, § 8, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 452, effective July 15, 2010.

230.280.
Requirement of license for race meeting — Qualifications of applicants.

No person shall hold or conduct any horse race meeting for any stake, purse, or reward within the Commonwealth of Kentucky without securing the required license from the racing commission.

The racing commission shall investigate the qualifications of each applicant for a license to conduct a horse race meeting or the renewal of a license to conduct a horse race meeting. The racing commission may issue or renew a license unless the racing commission determines that:

The track location, traffic flow, facilities for the public, and facilities for racing participants and horses do not meet state code or are otherwise inadequate to protect the public health and safety;

The racing dates and times requested conflict with another race meeting of the same breed of horse;

The financing or proposed financing of the entire operation is not adequate for the operation or is from an unsuitable source;

The applicant or licensee has failed to disclose or has misstated information or otherwise attempted to mislead the racing commission with respect to any material fact contained in the application for the issuance or renewal of the license;

The applicant has knowingly failed to comply with the provision of this chapter or any administrative regulations promulgated thereunder;

Any of the principals of the applicant or licensee is determined to be unsuitable because he or she has:

Been convicted of any crime of moral turpitude, embezzlement, or larceny, or any violation of any law pertaining to illegal gaming or gambling, or any crime that is inimical to the declared policy of the Commonwealth of Kentucky with regard to horse racing and pari-mutuel wagering thereon;

Been convicted in any jurisdiction within ten (10) years preceding initial licensing or license renewal of any crime that is or would be a felony or class A misdemeanor in the Commonwealth of Kentucky;

Been identified in the published reports of any federal or state legislative or executive body as being a member or associate of organized crime, or of being of notorious or unsavory reputation;

Been placed and remains in the custody of any federal, state, or local law enforcement authority;

Had a racing or gaming license revoked in another jurisdiction on grounds that would have been grounds for revoking the license in Kentucky; or

Engaged in any other activities that would pose a threat to the public interest or to the effective regulation of horse racing and wagering in Kentucky, or enhance the dangers of unsuitable, unfair, or illegal practices, methods, and activities in the conduct of racing and wagering or in the operation of the business and financial arrangements incidental thereto; or

The applicant or licensee has had a racing or gaming license denied or revoked in another jurisdiction on grounds that would be grounds for license denial or revocation in Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 184, § 8, effective June 16, 1960; 1992, ch. 109, § 18, effective March 30, 1992; 1998, ch. 237, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 2004, ch. 191, § 9, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 453, effective July 15, 2010.

230.290.
Provisions applicable to all licenses.

All licenses granted under this chapter:

Shall be in writing;

Shall be subject to all administrative regulations and conditions as may from time to time be prescribed by the racing commission;

Shall contain conditions as may be considered necessary or desirable by the racing commission for purposes of this chapter; and

No license shall extend beyond the end of the calendar year for which it was issued, unless the license expires on the last date of the birth month of the licensee, in which case it may expire on that date. The racing commission may renew any license and any renewal shall not be construed to be a waiver or condonement of any violation which occurred prior to renewal and shall not prevent subsequent proceedings against the licensee therefor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 184, § 9; 1970, ch. 156, § 4; 1992, ch. 109, § 19, effective March 30, 1992; 2004, ch. 191, § 10, effective July 13, 2004; 2009, ch. 80, § 5, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 24, § 454, effective July 15, 2010.

230.300.
License to conduct race meetings or engage in simulcasting and intertrack wagering as a receiving track — Application — Racing dates.

Any person desiring to conduct horse racing at a horse race meeting within the Commonwealth of Kentucky or to engage in simulcasting and intertrack wagering as a receiving track during any calendar year shall first apply to the racing commission for a license to do so. The application shall be filed at the racing commission’s general office on or before October 1 of the preceding year with respect to applications to conduct live horse race meetings, and with respect to intertrack wagering dates, and on forms prescribed by the racing commission. The application shall include the following information:

The full name and address of the person making application;

The location of the place, track, or enclosure where the applicant proposes to conduct horse racing meetings;

The dates on which the applicant intends to conduct horse racing, which shall be successive days unless authorized by the racing commission;

The proposed hours of each racing day and the number of races to be conducted;

The names and addresses of all principals associated with the applicant or licensee;

The type of organizational structure under which the applicant operates, i.e., partnership, trust, association, limited liability company, or corporation, and the address of the principal place of business of the organization;

Any criminal activities in any jurisdiction for which any individual listed under paragraphs (a) and (e) has been arrested or indicted and the disposition of the charges, and any current or on-going criminal investigation of which any of these individuals is the subject; and

Any other information that the racing commission by administrative regulation deems relevant and necessary to determine the fitness of the applicant to receive a license, including fingerprints of any individual listed under paragraphs (a) and (e), if necessary for proper identification of the individual or a determination of suitability to be associated with a licensed racing association.

An application for license shall be accompanied by the following documents:

For a new license applicant, a financial statement prepared and attested to by a certified public accountant in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, showing the following:

The net worth of the applicant;

Any debts or financial obligations owed by the applicant and the persons to whom owed; and

The proposed or current financing structure for the operation and the sources of financing.

For a license renewal applicant, an audited financial statement for the prior year;

A copy of the applicant’s federal and state tax return for the previous year. Tax returns submitted in accordance with this provision shall be treated as confidential;

A statement from the Department of Revenue that there are no delinquent taxes or other financial obligations owed by the applicant to the state or any of its agencies or departments;

A statement from the county treasurer of the county in which the applicant conducts or proposes to conduct horse racing meetings that there are no delinquent real or personal property taxes owed by the applicant.

The completed application shall be signed by the applicant or the chief executive officer if the applicant is an organization, sworn under oath that the information is true, accurate, and complete, and the application shall be notarized.

If there is any change in any information submitted in the application process, the applicant or licensee shall notify the racing commission within thirty (30) days of the change.

The racing commission shall as soon as practicable, but in no event later than November 1 in any calendar year, award dates for racing in the Commonwealth during the next year. In awarding dates, the racing commission shall consider and seek to preserve each track’s usual and customary dates, as these dates are requested. If dates other than the usual and customary dates are requested, the applicant shall include a statement in its application setting forth the reasons the requested dates are sought. Dates for the conduct of intertrack wagering shall be awarded as provided in KRS

230.377

. In the event scheduled racing is canceled by reason of flood, fire, inclement weather, or other natural disaster or emergency, the racing commission may award after November 1 additional racing dates to make up for those dates canceled.

The racing commission may issue a license to conduct a horse race meeting to any association making the aforesaid application if the applicant meets the requirements established in KRS

138.530

and other applicable provisions of this chapter, and if the racing commission finds that the proposed conduct of racing by the association would be in the best interest of the public health, safety, and welfare of the immediate community as well as to the Commonwealth.

As a condition precedent to the issuance of a license, the racing commission may require a surety bond or other surety conditioned upon the payment of all taxes due the Commonwealth, together with the payment of operating expenses including purses and awards to owners of horses participating in races.

The racing commission may impose a fee and shall establish, by administrative regulation promulgated in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, a fee schedule for association license applications.

The racing commission may require an applicant for an association license to submit to a background check of the applicant, or of any principal, individual, or organization associated with the applicant. The racing commission shall not require a background check for any individual who is a principal as defined in KRS

230.210

but owns stock or financial interest in the applicant of less than ten percent (10%). An applicant shall be required to reimburse the racing commission for the cost of any background check conducted.

Every license issued under this chapter shall specify among other things the name of the person to whom issued, the address and location of the track where the horse race meeting to which it relates is to be held or conducted, and the days and hours of the day when the meeting will be permitted; provided, however, that no track that is granted overlapping dates for the conduct of a live race meeting with another horse racing track within a fifty (50) mile radius shall be permitted to have a post time after 5:30 p.m., prevailing time for overlapping days between July 1 and September 15, unless agreed to in writing by the tracks affected.

A license issued under this section is neither transferable nor assignable and shall not permit the conduct of a horse race meeting at any track not specified therein. However, if the track specified becomes unsuitable for racing because of flood, fire, or other catastrophe, the racing commission may, upon application, authorize the meeting, or any remaining portion thereof, to be conducted at any other suitable track available for that purpose, provided that the owner of the track willingly consents to the use thereof.

Horse racing dates may be awarded and licenses issued authorizing horse racing on any day of the year. Horse racing shall be held or conducted only between sunrise and midnight.

The racing commission may at any time require the removal of any official or employee of any association in those instances where it has reason to believe that the official or employee has been guilty of any dishonest practice in connection with horse racing or has failed to comply with any condition of his license or has violated any law or any administrative regulation of this racing commission.

Every horse race not licensed under this section is hereby declared to be a public nuisance and the racing commission may obtain an injunction against the same in the Circuit Court of the county where the unlicensed race is proposed to take place.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 184, § 10; 1968, ch. 214; 1970, ch. 156, § 5; 1974, ch. 403, § 4; 1978, ch. 438, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1984, ch. 240, § 5, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 296, § 4, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 159, § 4, effective March 30, 1990; 1992, ch. 109, § 20, effective March 30, 1992; 1998, ch. 237, § 5, effective July 15, 1998; 2004, ch. 191, § 11, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 85, § 633, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 80, § 6, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 24, § 455, effective July 15, 2010.

230.310.
License for participants in horse racing.

Every person not required to be licensed under KRS

230.300

who desires to participate in horse racing in the Commonwealth as a horse owner, trainer, jockey, apprentice jockey, agent, stable employee, racing official, association employee, or employee of a person or concern contracting with the association to provide a service or commodity and which requires their presence on association grounds during a race meeting, or veterinarian, farrier, horse dentist, or supplier of food, tack, medication, or horse feed, or in any other capacity as the racing commission shall from time to time establish by administrative regulation, shall first apply to the racing commission for a license to participate in the activity on association grounds during a race meeting. No person required to be licensed by this section may participate in any activity required to be licensed on association grounds during a race meeting without a valid license therefor. An applicant for a license shall submit to the racing commission fingerprints as may be required and other information necessary and reasonable for processing a license application. The racing commission is authorized to exchange fingerprint data with the Department of Kentucky State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation in order to conduct a criminal history background check of an applicant. The racing commission may issue a license if it finds that the financial responsibility, age, experience, reputation, competence, and general fitness of the applicant to perform the activity permitted by a license are consistent with the best interest of racing and the maintenance of the honesty, integrity, and high quality thereof.

A license may be issued for the calendar year for which an applicant applies or, if authorized by administrative regulation, a license may be issued that expires on the last day of the birth month of the licensee. A license may be renewed by the racing commission. The license shall be valid at all horse race meetings in the Commonwealth during the period for which it is issued unless suspended or revoked under the administrative regulations promulgated by the racing commission under this chapter. With respect to horse owners and trainers, the racing commission may promulgate administrative regulations to facilitate and promote uniform, reciprocal licensing with other states.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 184, § 11; 1970, ch. 156, § 6; 1974, ch. 403, § 5; 1986, ch. 214, § 5, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 109, § 21, effective March 30, 1992; 2004, ch. 191, § 12, effective July 13, 2004; 2007, ch. 85, § 262, effective June 26, 2007; 2009, ch. 80, § 7, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 24, § 456, effective July 15, 2010.

230.320.
Denial, revocation, or suspension of license — Stay of imposition of stewards’ decision — Review — Frivolous appeals.

Every license granted under this chapter is subject to denial, revocation, or suspension, and every licensee or other person participating in Kentucky horse racing may be assessed an administrative fine and required to forfeit or return a purse, by the racing commission in any case where it has reason to believe that any provision of this chapter, administrative regulation, or condition of the racing commission affecting it has not been complied with or has been broken or violated. The racing commission may deny, revoke, or suspend a license for failure by the licensee or other person participating in Kentucky horse racing to pay an administrative fine imposed upon the licensee by the stewards or the racing commission. The racing commission, in the interest of honesty and integrity of horse racing, may promulgate administrative regulations under which any license may be denied, suspended, or revoked, and under which any licensee or other person participating in Kentucky horse racing may be assessed an administrative fine or required to forfeit or return a purse.

Following a hearing by the stewards, a person who has been disciplined by a ruling of the stewards may apply to the racing commission for a stay of the ruling, pending action on an appeal by the racing commission.

An application for a stay shall be received by the executive director or his designee within ten (10) calendar days of the issuance of the stewards’ ruling.

An application for a stay shall be in writing and include the following:

The name, address, telephone number, and signature of the person requesting the stay;

A statement of the justification for the stay; and

The period of time for which the stay is requested.

On a finding of good cause, the executive director or his designee may grant the stay. The executive director or his designee shall issue a written decision granting or denying the request for stay within five (5) calendar days from the time the application for stay is received by the executive director or his designee. If the executive director or his designee fails to timely issue a written decision, then the stay is deemed granted. The executive director or his designee may rescind a stay granted under this subsection for good cause.

A person who is denied a stay by the executive director or his designee, or has a previously granted stay rescinded under paragraph (d) of this subsection, may petition the racing commission to overrule the executive director’s or designee’s denial or rescission of the stay. The petition shall be filed in writing with the chairperson of the racing commission and received by the chairperson within ten (10) calendar days of the mailing of the executive director’s or designee’s denial of the stay. The petition shall state the name, address, phone number, and signature of the petitioner; a statement of justification of the stay; and the time period for which the stay is requested. The chairperson shall convene a special meeting of the racing commission within ten (10) calendar days of receipt of the petition, and the racing commission shall issue a written final order granting or denying the petition within two (2) calendar days of the special meeting. If the racing commission fails to timely issue a final order on the petition, then the stay is granted. The racing commission may rescind a stay granted under this subsection for good cause.

A person who is denied or has a previously granted stay rescinded by the racing commission may file an appeal of the final written order of the racing commission in the Circuit Court of the county in which the cause of action arose.

The fact that a stay is granted is not a presumption that the ruling by the stewards is invalid.

If any license is denied, suspended, or revoked, or if any licensee or other person participating in Kentucky horse racing is assessed an administrative fine or required to forfeit or return a purse, after a hearing by the stewards or by the racing commission acting on a complaint or by its own volition, the racing commission shall grant the applicant, licensee, or other person the right to appeal the decision, and upon appeal, an administrative hearing shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

The racing commission may at any time order that any case pending before the stewards be immediately transferred to the racing commission for an administrative hearing conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

In an administrative appeal to the racing commission by a licensee or other person participating in Kentucky horse racing, the racing commission may determine in its final order that the appeal is frivolous. If the racing commission finds that an appeal is frivolous:

This fact shall be considered an aggravating circumstance and may be considered in assessing any penalty against the licensee; and

The licensee or other person who raised the appeal may be required to reimburse the racing commission for the cost of the investigation of the underlying circumstances of the case and the cost of the adjudication of the appeal. Costs may include but are not limited to fees paid to a hearing officer or court reporter, attorneys fees, and laboratory expenses.

The racing commission shall by administrative regulation prescribe the conditions or factors by which an appeal may be determined to be frivolous.

Any administrative action authorized in this chapter shall be in addition to any criminal penalties provided in this chapter or under other provisions of law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 184, § 12; 1974, ch. 403, § 6; 1982, ch. 100, § 4, effective July 15, 1982; 1988, ch. 376, § 7, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 109, § 22, effective March 30, 1992; 1996, ch. 318, § 149, effective July 15, 1996; 2004, ch. 191, § 13, effective July 13, 2004; 2009, ch. 80, § 8, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 24, § 457, effective July 15, 2010.

230.330.
Appeal of any order to Franklin Circuit Court.

Any licensee or any applicant aggrieved by any final order of the racing commission may appeal to the Franklin Circuit Court in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 184, § 13; 1996, ch. 318, § 150, effective July 15, 1996; 2004, ch. 191, § 14, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 458, effective July 15, 2010.

230.340.
Regulation of pari-mutuel wagering. [Renumbered as KRS 230.361.]

230.350.
Licensee may be issued temporary alcoholic beverage license — Limited sale local option election, conditions. [Renumbered.]

230.352.
Issuance of licenses to sell distilled spirits, wine, and malt beverages on track’s premises. [Renumbered.]

230.355.
Hearing officer — Rulings, effect. [Repealed.]